Washington statutes.
RCW 17.04.170

Indian reservation lands—United States lands.

Any lands owned by any individual wholly or partly within the United States government Indian reservation may be included within a weed district formed under this chapter, and shall be subject to the same rules, regulations and taxes as other lands within the district; and the board of directors of any weed district are authorized to arrange with the officer or agent in charge of any United States lands, within or contiguous to any such district, for the destruction, prevention and extermination of weeds on such government lands.

[ 1929 c 125 s 7; RRS s 2775-2.]